lt-LT: Medalio tvirtinimo stilius: Karabinas; Raktų žiedas; Juostelė ant kaklo; Kaklo juostelė; Be priedo (tik medalis); Segtukas nugarėlėje; Žiogelis; Kita
sk-SK: Štýl upevnenia medaily: Karabína; Krúžok na kľúče; Šnúrka na krk; Stuha na krk; Bez pripevnenia (iba medaila); Zapínanie na špendlík; Zatvárací špendlík; Iné
sl-SI: Stil pritrjevanja medalje: Karabin; Obroček za ključe; Trak; Ovratni trak; Brez pritrditve (samo medalja); Zaponka; Varnostna zaponka; Drugo
tr: Madalya bağlantı stili: Karabina klipsi; Anahtarlık; Boyun askısı; Boyun kurdelesi; Eklenti yok (sadece madalya); İğne arkalıklı; Çengelli iğne; Diğer
de: Befestigungsart der Medaille: Karabinerhaken; Schlüsselring; Lanyard; Halsband; Keine Befestigung (nur Medaille); Anstecknadel; Sicherheitsnadel; Sonstiges
fi: Mitalin kiinnitystyyppi: Karbiinihaka; Avainrengas; Kaulanauha; Mitalinauha; Ei kiinnitystä (vain mitali); Neulakiinnitys; Hakaneula; Muu
nl: Bevestigingswijze medaille: Karabijnhaak; Sleutelhanger; Lanyard; Halslint; Geen bevestiging (alleen medaille); Speldsluiting; Veiligheidsspeld; Overige
hr-HR: Stil pričvršćenja medalje: Karabiner; Privjesak za ključeve; Uzica; Vrpca za vrat; Bez dodataka (samo medalja); Kopča na stražnjoj strani; Sigurnosna igla; Ostalo
pl: Styl mocowania medalu: Karabińczyk; Kółko na klucze; Smycz; Wstążka na szyję; Bez mocowania (tylko medal); Zapięcie na pin; Agrafka; Inne
hu: Medál rögzítésének stílusa: Karabiner; Kulcstartó karika; Nyakpánt; Nyakszalag; Nincs rögzítés (csak érem); Hátlapi tű; Biztosítótű; Egyéb
zh-TW: 獎牌固定樣式: 登山扣; 鑰匙圈; 掛繩; 頸帶; 無配件 (僅獎牌); 別針扣; 安全別針; 其他
ko: 메달 부착 방식: 카라비너 클립; 키링; 랜야드; 넥 리본; 부착물 없음(메달 전용); 핀 백; 안전 핀; 기타
fr: Type de fixation de la médaille: Mousqueton; Porte-clés; Lanière; Ruban de cou; Sans attache (médaille seule); Fermoir à épingle; Épingle de sûreté; Autre
bg-BG: Стил на закрепване на медала: Карабинер; Халка за ключодържател; Връзка за врат; Лента за врат; Без прикрепване (само медал); С игла; Безопасна игла; Друго
da: Fastgørelsesstil for medalje: Karabinhage; Nøglering; Halsrem; Halsbånd; Ingen fastgørelse (kun medalje); Nål på bagsiden; Sikkerhedsnål; Andet
en: Medal attachment style: Carabiner clip; Keyring; Lanyard; Neck ribbon; No attachment (medal only); Pin back; Safety pin; Other
th: รูปแบบการติดเหรียญรางวัล: คลิปตะขอเกี่ยวนิรภัย; พวงกุญแจ; สายคล้อง; ริบบิ้นคล้องคอ; ไม่มีสิ่งที่แนบมา (เฉพาะเหรียญเท่านั้น); หมุดด้านหลัง; เข็มกลัดซ่อนปลาย; อื่นๆ
it: Stile di attacco della medaglia: Moschettone; Portachiavi; Cordino; Nastro da collo; Nessun aggancio (solo medaglia); Spilla sul retro; Spilla da balia; Altro
ja: メダルアタッチメントスタイル: カラビナクリップ; キーリング; ストラップ; ネックリボン; アタッチメントなし (メダルのみ); ピンバック; 安全ピン; その他
zh-CN: 奖牌佩戴方式: 登山扣; 钥匙圈; 挂绳; 颈带; 无配件（仅奖牌）; 别针扣; 安全别针; 其他
ru: Стиль крепления медали: Карабин; Кольцо для ключей; Ланьярд; Лента на шею; Без крепления (только медаль); Крепление на пине; Булавка; Другое
vi: Kiểu gắn huy chương: Móc khóa carabiner; Móc khóa; Dây đeo cổ; Dải ruy băng đeo cổ; Không có móc (chỉ huy chương); Kim gài mặt sau; Kim băng; Khác
ro-RO: Stil de prindere a medaliei: Carabinieră; Inel pentru chei; Șnur; Panglică pentru gât; Fără prindere (doar medalia); Cu ac; Ac de siguranță; Altele
es: Tipo de sujeción de la medalla: Mosquetón; Llavero; Cordón; Cinta para el cuello; Sin enganche (solo medalla); Cierre de alfiler; Imperdible; Otro
sv: Modell för medaljfäste: Karbinhake; Nyckelring; Nyckelband; Medaljband; Inget fäste (endast medalj); Nålfäste bak; Säkerhetsnål; Annat
pt-PT: Estilo de fixação da medalha: Mosquetão; Argola de porta-chaves; Lanyard; Fita de pescoço; Sem acessório (apenas medalha); Com alfinete; Alfinete de ama; Outro
nb: Festestil for medalje: Karabinkrok; Nøkkelring; Snor; Halsbånd; Ingen feste (kun medalje); Nålfeste; Sikkerhetsnål; Annet
pt-BR: Estilo de fixação da medalha: Mosquetão; Chaveiro; Cordão; Fita de pescoço; Sem fixação (apenas medalha); Verso com pino; Alfinete de segurança; Outro
el: Τρόπος στερέωσης του μεταλλίου: Κλιπ καραμπίνερ; Μπρελόκ; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Κορδέλα λαιμού; Χωρίς εξάρτημα (μόνο μετάλλιο); Πίσω όψη με καρφίτσα; Παραμάνα; Άλλο
cs: Způsob uchycení medaile: Karabina; Kroužek na klíče; Šňůrka na krk; Stuha na krk; Bez uchycení (pouze medaile); Špendlík; Zavírací špendlík; Jiné